Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin THIRD-PARTY PARTNERSHIPS IN CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES; DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of corrections must identify and evaluate options to improve dental services provided in correctional facilities through partnerships with nonstate entities. The commissioner must evaluate the following options for partnership: new text end new text begin (1) accredited schools of dentistry and schools of dental hygiene, including the University of Minnesota School of Dentistry; new text end new text begin (2) dental programs for the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene for students and clinical trainees acting under the supervision of a Minnesota-licensed dentist or hygienist; and new text end new text begin (3) mobile dental clinics. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of corrections must report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety and corrections policy and finance on the options the commissioner evaluated under paragraph (a). The report must make recommendations relating to: new text end new text begin (1) dental partnerships that would improve dental services provided in correctional facilities; new text end new text begin (2) financing a dental partnership in correctional facilities; and new text end new text begin (3) other legislative actions needed to improve dental services in correctional facilities. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of corrections must improve dental services in correctional facilities by increasing inmate preventative care, restorative and periodontal treatments, and access to urgent and emergency care. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of corrections to improve dental services in correctional facilities by increasing inmate preventative care, restorative and periodontal treatments, and access to urgent and emergency care. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of corrections for the evaluation of and report on partnerships with nonstate entities to improve dental services provided in correctional facilities. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end